Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1

Medical Assistance Act

71-5-101. Short title.

This part may be cited as and shall be known as the “Medical Assistance Act of 1968.”

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-1901, 14-23-101.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of certain TennCare-related functions from the department of finance and administration to the department of health, see Executive Order No. 11 (January 3, 1997).

For transfer of the TennCare program and its related functions and administrative support from the department of health to the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 23 (October 19, 1999).

Cross-References. Community grant agencies, title 8, ch. 4, part 4.

Health Maintenance Organizations, title 56, ch. 32.

Interstate Compact on Adoption and Medical Assistance, title 36, ch. 1, part 2.

Physician assistants, §§63-19-106,63-19-107.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Issues Raised by States' Exclusion of Fertility Drugs from Medicaid Coverage in Light of Mandated Coverage of Viagra, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 359 (2001).

Health Care Reform Through Medicaid Managed Care: Tennessee (TennCare) as a Case Study and a Paradigm, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 125 (2000).

Medicaid Managed Care and Disability Discrimination Issues (Mary Crossley), 65 Tenn. L. Rev. 419 (1998).

Attorney General Opinions. TennCare/House Bill 2002, OAG 00-016, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/2/00).

Permissibility of modifications to the TennCare Program. OAG 12-106, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 110 (11/26/12).

71-5-102. Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to make possible medical assistance to those recipients determined to be eligible under this chapter to receive medical assistance that conforms to the requirements of Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), and the regulations promulgated pursuant to Title XIX. Medical assistance pursuant to this part may also be provided pursuant to any federal waiver received by the state that waives any or all of the provisions of Title XIX or pursuant to any other applicable federal law to the extent adopted by means of an amendment to the required Title XIX state plan.

Except as may be required by federal law or regulation, it is hereby declared to be the public policy of the state of Tennessee that participation in the TennCare program, or its successor programs, is not an entitlement and is conditional upon, among other things, specific appropriations for the program.

Not less than annually, the governor shall recommend and the general assembly may, through provisions of the general appropriations act, prioritize the funding for the TennCare program in a manner that specifies that funds are available to:

Continue coverage for enrollees currently in the program;

Extend coverage to potential new enrollees, or categories of new enrollees, at current, higher or lower income levels;

Withdraw coverage from all enrollees not eligible for medicaid; or

Reimburse medical care providers for costs unreimbursed by managed care organizations out of state funds appropriated for that purpose or such federal funds as would be permitted to be used for that purpose under the terms of the TennCare waiver.

Continuation, extension and withdrawal of coverage for enrollees in the TennCare program shall be determined in accordance with such priorities, if any, established by the general assembly in the general appropriations act.

The bureau of TennCare shall have the authority to develop and implement initiatives or program modifications to control the costs of the TennCare program to the extent permitted under federal law and the TennCare waiver. Such cost-saving measures may include, but are not limited to, the elimination of covered benefits or limitations on the scope, intensity, or duration of such benefits; implementation of cost sharing requirements for enrollees, including the medicaid population; increases in cost sharing requirements for the expansion population; enforcement of cost sharing requirements through denial of service for failure to meet co-payment requirements with alternative access to medically necessary care through established safety net providers; enforcement of collection of required co-payments by providers; reassignment of enrollees into different eligibility categories; restrictions on eligibility for non-mandatory medicaid or waiver expansion categories; and the elimination from TennCare eligibility of some or all of the non-mandatory medicaid or waiver expansion categories. The bureau of TennCare may implement a premium-assistance initiative for persons disenrolled from TennCare. The bureau of TennCare shall also be authorized, in establishing or modifying benefits or cost sharing requirements, to define, through rules and regulations, categories of eligible enrollees who may be exempted from some or all benefit limits or cost sharing requirements, along with any requirements that must be met by such enrollees to prove or maintain exempted status. The bureau of TennCare shall have all such authority to control costs notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 2; 1973, ch. 276, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-1902; Acts 1982, ch. 730, § 1; T.C.A., §14-23-102; Acts 1993, ch. 358, § 1; 2002, ch. 880, § 3; 2004, ch. 673, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The provisions of this section may be affected by the agreement between the federal and state governments that created the TennCare program.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and reverifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Physician assistants, §§63-19-106,63-19-107.

Rules and regulations, finding medical assistance, §71-5-134.

Tennessee Medicaid False Claims Act, §§71-5-181 —71-5-185.

71-5-103. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adult behavioral health services for the seriously and persistently mentally ill” means behavioral health services for individuals nineteen (19) years of age and older, including, but not limited to, assessment, evaluation, diagnostic, therapeutic intervention, case management, psychiatric medication management, labs related to medication management and pharmacy assistance and coordination;

“Adult emergency dental services” means dental services for individuals twenty-one (21) years of age and older to treat a dental condition that manifests itself by symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe pain, infection or trauma, that:

A prudent layperson who possesses an average knowledge of health and medicine, could reasonably expect the absence of immediate dental attention to potentially result in:

Placing the person's, or with respect to a pregnant woman, her unborn child's, health in jeopardy;

Serious impairment of bodily functions;

Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part; or

Includes treatment of dental condition necessary for an individual to receive essential medical treatment, including, but not limited to, extraction of abscessed or periodontally involved teeth prior to an individual receiving a prosthetic heart valve, a donor organ, other replacement prosthetic devices or head and neck radiation therapy;

“Applicant” means any person who has applied for benefits under this part;

“County office” means the county office of the state department of human services in the county wherein the applicant resides;

“Department” means the department of health;

“Home-based and community-based services” means any of the following supportive services and systems, as approved by the health care financing administration (HCFA), that are provided to older persons and individuals with disabilities to remain independent and avoid inappropriate institutionalization and that help individuals maintain physical, social, and spiritual independence in the least restrictive environment:

Living environments and supportive services, e.g., assisted care living facilities, homes for the aged and assistive technology;

Personal care, homemaker and chore services;

Adult day services;

Congregate and home delivered meals;

Home care organizations;

Rehabilitative care;

Assisted transportation or mobility services; and

Support services to caregivers, including hospice and respite care;

“Medical assistance” means payment of the cost of care, services and supplies necessary to prevent, diagnose, correct or cure conditions in the person that cause acute suffering, endanger life, result in illness or infirmity, interfere with the person's capacity for normal activity, or threaten some significant handicap and that are furnished an eligible person in accordance with this part and the rules and regulations of the department. Such care, services and supplies include services of qualified practitioners licensed under the laws of this state;

“Medically needy” means a class or classes of persons whose present income and financial assets are not sufficient to meet their present liabilities for health costs; provided, that the department of health or the department of human services, as may be designated by the governor, may through regulation establish an income limitation as well as other criteria, such as cash, savings, intangible assets and real and personal property for the determination of “medically needy.” To the extent of any federal waiver received by the state that waives any or all of the provisions of Title XIX (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), or pursuant to any other federal law as adopted by amendment to the required Title XIX state plan, “medically needy” means those persons whose income and assets are insufficient to purchase health insurance and those persons who are uninsurable as a result of an existing or prior medical condition;

“Mobile dental services” means an intact comprehensive dental services unit operated on-site at a long-term care facility, interfacing with the facility's common electrical and water sources;

“Recipient” means any person who has been determined eligible to receive benefits under this part and who has received such benefits;

“Resident” means any individual who is living within the state, with the intent that such person's permanent home be within the state, and not temporarily. Temporary absences from the state shall not cause a person to lose residential status;

“Responsible parties” means the following representatives and relatives of recipients of medical assistance pursuant to this part who are not financially eligible to receive benefits under this part: parents, spouses, children, and guardians;

“Title XIX” means Title XIX of the Social Security Act as amended (P.L. 89-97) (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), administered by the United States department of health and human services or its successor in office and including amendments of Title XIX and other federal social security laws replacing that title in whole or in part; and

“Vendor” means any person, institution, agency, or business concern providing medical care services or goods authorized under this part, holding, where applicable, a current valid license to provide such services or to dispense such goods; or any health maintenance organization, as defined in title 56, chapter 32, with which the state has entered into a contract based on a per capita rate of payment for services provided under this part.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 3; 1973, ch. 276, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); Acts 1979, ch. 177, § 2; T.C.A., § 14-1903; Acts 1981, ch. 286, § 1; 1982, ch. 730, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., §14-23-103; Acts 1993, ch. 358, § 2; 1998, ch. 1093, § 3; 2002, ch. 717, § 1; 2008, ch. 1064, § 1; 2009, ch. 95, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The provisions of this section may be affected by the agreement between the federal and state governments that created the TennCare program.

Compiler's Notes. For the transfer of TennCare from the department of finance and administration to the department of health, See Executive Orders Nos. 1 (January 26, 1995) and 11 (January 7, 1997).

For transfer of the TennCare program and its related functions and administrative support from the department of health to the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 23 (October 19, 1999).

For the Preamble to the act regarding the behavioral health safety net of Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 95.

Cross-References. Rules and regulations, finding medical assistance, §71-5-134.

Tennessee Medicaid False Claims Act, §§71-5-181 —71-5-185.

71-5-104. Administration by department.

The department of health is hereby designated as the department to administer this part as provided in Title XIX or as provided by any federal waiver received by the state that waives any or all of the provisions of Title XIX or pursuant to any other federal law as adopted by amendment to the required Title XIX state plan.

The bureau of TennCare shall notify each member of the general assembly via electronic mail or other type of electronic communication when it:

Proposes a change in services or reimbursement that affects more than two thousand five hundred (2,500) beneficiaries; or

Proposes a change that will affect current or future appropriations made by the general assembly in any amount that is greater than ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

The bureau of TennCare shall report at least quarterly to members of the Tennessee general assembly via electronic mail or other type of electronic communication on the following:

Status of TennCare reform and improvements;

Number of recipients on TennCare and costs to the state;

Viability of MCOs and providers in the TennCare program; and

Success of fraud detection and prevention.

The bureau of TennCare shall concurrently transmit to members of the general assembly via electronic mail or other type of electronic communication TennCare's annual budget proposal when presented in a public forum.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 4; 1973, ch. 276, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a), (b); T.C.A., § 14-1904; Acts 1982, ch. 730, § 4; T.C.A., §14-23-104; Acts 1993, ch. 358, § 3; 2010, ch. 1079, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the transfer of TennCare from the department of finance and administration to the department of health, See Executive Orders Nos. 1 (January 26, 1995) and 11 (January 7, 1997).

For transfer of the TennCare program and its related functions and administrative support from the department of health to the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 23 (October 19, 1999).

Cross-References. Rules and regulations, finding medical assistance, §71-5-134.

Tennessee Medicaid False Claims Act, §§71-5-181 —71-5-185.

71-5-105. Powers and duties of department — Total number of ICF/MR beds — Certificate of need exemption for DIDD public ICF/MR non-facility beds established pursuant to federal litigation.

The department shall:

Supervise the administration of medical assistance for eligible recipients;

Make uniform rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the law, for implementing, administering and enforcing this part in an efficient, economical and impartial manner;

Establish, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury, rules and regulations for the determination of payment for hospitals, and other health care providers who contract with the department for the care of persons eligible for assistance pursuant to this part;

Establish, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury and the Tennessee Health Care Association (THCA), rules for an acuity and quality-based reimbursement methodology for nursing facility services paid for by the bureau of TennCare under the rules of the department and as designated and certified by the department. Payment determination components shall include acuity adjusted direct care, non-acuity adjusted direct care, quality, administration, fair market value capital, a cost-based component, and an inflation index factor. The inflation index factor that shall be the most recent Skilled Nursing Facility without Capital Market Basket Index as published by IHS Global Insight (IHS Economics) or other index as may be agreed to by the bureau of TennCare and the comptroller of the treasury, in consultation with THCA, should this index cease to be produced. The commissioner may establish the maximum amount to be paid to nursing facilities, consistent with the requirements of federal law and § 71-5-124(b);

Cooperate with the appropriate federal department in any reasonable manner as may be necessary to qualify for federal aid in connection with the medical assistance program;

Within sixty (60) days after the close of each fiscal year, prepare and print an annual report, which shall be submitted to the governor and members of the general assembly. This report shall include a full account of the operations and the expenditures of all funds under this part, adequate and complete statistics divided by counties about all medical assistance within the state, rules and regulations of the department promulgated to carry out this part, and such other information as it may deem advisable;

Prepare or have prepared and release a summary statement monthly showing by counties the amount paid under this part and the total number of persons assisted;

Establish and enforce safeguards to prevent unauthorized disclosures or improper use of the information contained in applications, reports of investigations and medical examinations, and correspondence in the individual case records of recipients of medical assistance;

Furnish information to acquaint needy persons and the public generally with the plan for medical assistance of this state;

Cooperate with agencies in other states in establishing reciprocal agreements to provide for payment of medical assistance to recipients who have moved to another state, consistent with this part and of Title XIX as amended;

Contract, to the extent feasible, with one (1) or more contractors or fiscal intermediaries, or both, to provide or arrange services under this part. All such contracts shall be procured in accordance with the requirements of title 12, chapter 4, part 1; provided, that the department shall be required to solicit competitive proposals for contracts with fiscal intermediaries;

Increase the coverage under medicaid for inpatient hospital days from fourteen (14) days to twenty (20) days, as provided for in the public health regulations of the United States department of health and human services, health care financing administration (HCFA). Coverage for inpatient hospital days shall be unlimited for any infant under the age of one (1) year to the extent required by federal law or regulations. The commissioner is further directed to promulgate a rule establishing a system of prospective reimbursement, targeted reimbursement, diagnosis-related groups, other method of reimbursement related to diagnosis, or other method of reimbursement pursuant to any federal waiver that waives any or all of the provisions of Title XIX that the state may receive or pursuant to any other federal law as adopted by amendment to the required Title XIX state plan, at which time such mechanism shall be used to determine the number of inpatient hospital days instead of the twenty-day limitation provided in this subdivision (a)(11); and

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, assist the council on children's mental health care in developing a plan that will establish demonstration sites in certain geographic areas where children's mental health care is child-centered, family-driven, and culturally and linguistically competent and that provides a coordinated system of care for children's mental health needs in this state.

The total number of beds in private for-profit and private not-for-profit intermediate care facilities for persons with mental retardation (ICF/MR) facilities shall not exceed a total maximum number of six hundred sixty-eight (668). In compliance with the certificate of need process, private for-profit and private not-for-profit ICF/MR beds may be transferred from one location to another but the total number of such beds shall not exceed six hundred sixty-eight (668).

Beginning July 1, 2006, the total number of beds in ICF/MR facilities shall increase by forty (40) beds per year for the next four (4) years, resulting in a maximum of eight hundred twenty-eight (828) beds by July 1, 2009. Only providers that have been providing services to persons with developmental disabilities under contract with the state for at least five (5) years shall be eligible to apply for these new beds. These new beds shall be initially filled by persons exiting the developmental centers, and upon the death or discharge of the person who exited the developmental center, the bed may be filled by individuals currently enrolled in one of the home and community based services (HCBS) waivers for individuals with intellectual disabilities or the waiting list for individuals with intellectual disabilities, subject to the individual's freedom of choice and pursuant to a process established and administered by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities (DIDD) in order to ensure that such placement is the most integrated and cost-effective setting appropriate. Providers may refuse persons based on needs compatibility with the total mix of persons in the facility. If fewer than four (4) persons transitioning from a developmental center as part of the developmental center closure have selected a provider, the remaining beds necessary to establish the four-person home may be filled by individuals currently enrolled in one of the HCBS waivers for individuals with intellectual disabilities or the waiting list for individuals with intellectual disabilities, subject to the individual's freedom of choice and pursuant to a process established and administered by DIDD in order to ensure that such placement is the most integrated and cost-effective setting appropriate. DIDD shall do everything possible to provide referrals for these new beds. DIDD shall demonstrate a commitment to ensuring the individual's freedom of choice and ensure that every eligible service recipient is fully informed of all services available to them, including community ICF/MR facilities and the specialized services they provide.

DIDD is to appoint a nine-person taskforce to review oversight, utilization, and future need for ICF/MR services and make recommendations to the general assembly and governor by June 30, 2007. Three (3) of the members of the taskforce shall be appointed by the DIDD from a list of persons provided by Tennessee Community Organizations (TNCO), and three (3) of the members shall be appointed by DIDD from a list of persons provided by ARC of Tennessee. The remaining three (3) members shall be employees of DIDD or other state agencies. DIDD shall designate one (1) of the members as chair of the taskforce.

Notwithstanding any authority to the contrary, DIDD public ICF/MR non-facility beds established pursuant to federal litigation settlements or orders arising out of the cases United States v. State of Tennessee , 798 F. Supp. 483; 1992 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14004 (W.D. Tenn. 1992), or People First of Tennessee, et al., v. Clover Bottom Developmental Center, et al. , NO. 00-5342 (Docket) (C.A.6 Mar. 22, 2000), shall be exempt from all requirements and processes for the application and granting of certificates of need as set forth in § 68-11-1607. The establishment of all private ICF/MR non-facility beds remains subject to certificate of need requirements and processes.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 5; T.C.A., § 14-1905; Acts 1982, ch. 730, § 5; 1984, ch. 787, § 9; 1986, ch. 831, § 1; 1986, ch. 884, § 1; T.C.A., §14-23-105; Acts 1989, ch. 45, § 1; 1989, ch. 296, § 1; 1992, ch. 903, § 1; 1993, ch. 358, § 4; 1997, ch. 478, § 3; 2006, ch. 761, § 1; 2007, ch. 307, § 1; 2008, ch. 1062, § 11; 2008, ch. 1190, § 19; 2009, ch. 458, § 1; 2009, ch. 477, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 139; 2013, ch. 239, § 1; 2016, ch. 630, § 1; 2018, ch. 836, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The provisions of this section may be affected by the agreement between the federal and state governments that created the TennCare program.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1984, ch. 787, § 14, provided “Rules and regulations of the comptroller and other departments of state government affected by this act shall remain in effect until subsequently repealed. Rules and regulations promulgated hereunder may be initially promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208).”

For the transfer of TennCare from the department of finance and administration to the department of health, See Executive Orders Nos. 1 (January 26, 1995) and 11 (January 7, 1997).

For transfer of the TennCare program and its related functions and administrative support from the department of health to the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 23 (October 19, 1999).

Acts 2002, ch. 844, §§ 1-3 provided that:

“The fiscal review committee is directed to study: (1) The need for placement of additional beds at private community-based, not-for-profit ICF/MR facilities; (2) Current rates for payment of costs in ICFs/MR and whether current methodology and procedures to establish such rates are appropriate and adequate to insure the lowest and most cost-effective services; 3) Administrative oversight of ICFs/MR facilities to assess adequacy of control to insure cost-effective service delivery and appropriate programmatic quality control; and (4) The role of ICFs/MR in the overall system of services and supports, including admissions and discharges; and to make appropriate legislative proposals to implement any recommendations the committee determines to be beneficial to the state of Tennessee and its citizens. The committee shall specifically consider the necessity of adding beds to certain facilities in light of the costs of such additions. The committee shall also study whether additional capacity should be added to other forms of housing such as supported living and the effects of changes on developmental disability centers.

“The departments of health and mental health and developmental disabilities and the division of mental retardation services shall provide assistance to the fiscal review committee upon request of the chair.

“The fiscal review committee shall timely report its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation or interim reports, to the One Hundred Third General Assembly no later than February 15, 2003.”

For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

Acts 2009, ch. 477, § 1, directed the code commission to change all references from “division of mental retardation services” to “division of intellectual disabilities services” and to include the changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Annual list of medicaid options, duty to furnish, §68-1-110.

Certificate of need for health facilities, §68-11-1607.

Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

Rules and regulations, funding medical assistance, §71-5-134.

Tennessee Medicaid False Claims Act, §§71-5-181 —71-5-185.

“Title XIX” defined, §71-5-103.

Attorney General Opinions. Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act/TennCare/Medicaid interplay, OAG 07-165, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 165 (12/14/07).